Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-276
Standing.

(MBCA 7.41) A shareholder may not commence
or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the shareholder:

(1) Was a shareholder of
the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of or became
a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder
at that time; and

(2)
Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing
the right of the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 76.